Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB77.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "potentially hazardous food" in section 5702 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Potentially hazardous food." The term shall have the same meaning as [defined in the 2009] the term "time/temperature control for safety food" in section 1-201 in the 2022 edition of 1234567891011121314151617 the Food Code published by the [Department of Health and Human Services,] United States Food and Drug Administration, or any successor [document] standards approved by [regulation of] the department under section 5707(e) (relating to powers of department).* * *Section 2. Section 5705 of Title 3 is amended to read:§ 5705. [(Reserved).] Food allergy awareness.(a) Requirements.--Each proprietor of a retail food facility shall : (1) Prominently display a poster acceptable to the department and in accordance with subsection (b) in the employee area that provides information for employees on food allergy awareness.(2) Include on a food menu or through other written information a notice to a customer of food allergens used in the retail food facility and a request for the customer to inform the employee serving the customer about the customer's food allergy.(b) Posters.--The department shall require posters under this section to contain, at a minimum, a description of the major food allergens and symptoms of an allergic reaction and any other related requirements that are specified in the Food Code, published by the United States Food and Drug Administration. The following apply:(1) The secretary shall transmit notice of the other related requirements that are specified in the version of the Food Code that is in effect on the effective date of this paragraph to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20250HB0077PN0029 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The secretary shall review any subsequent changes to the other related requirements that are specified under the Food Code and shall transmit notice of the changes to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. Section 5707(a) of Title 3 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5707. Powers of department.(a) Rules and regulations.--The department shall make such reasonable rules and regulations as may be deemed necessary for carrying out the provisions and intent of this subchapter. In promulgating regulations, the department shall be guided by the [most current] 2022 edition of the Food Code, published by the United States [Department of Health,] Food and Drug Administration or any successor standards approved by the department under subsection (e). The regulatory standards established by the department under this section shall be the standards followed and applied by any licensor with respect to retail food facilities.* * *(e) Incorporation by reference.--(1) The secretary shall review the 2022 edition of the Food Code, published by the United States Food and Drug Administration, and transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the approved standards under subsection (a).(2) The secretary shall review any subsequent changes to the Food Code and shall transmit notice of approved standards under subsection (a) to the Legislative Reference Bureau for 20250HB0077PN0029 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0077PN0029 - 4 - 123